Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Marine Toilets

235.410.
Definitions for KRS 235.410 to 235.470.

As used in KRS

235.410

to

235.470

, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words shall have the following meanings:

“Houseboat” means any recreational or pleasure-type vessel, including, but not limited to, cruisers, yachts, or runabouts equipped with a marine sanitation device, and which can be used as an overnight residence;

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water;

“Person” or “persons” means any individual, public or private corporation, political subdivision, government agency, municipality, industry, copartnership, association, firm, trust, estate, or other entity whatsoever;

“Sewage” means the water-carried human or animal wastes from residences, buildings, industrial establishments, vessels, or other places, together with such industrial wastes, underground, surface, storm or other water, as may be present;

“Industrial wastes” means liquid, or other wastes resulting from any process of industry, manufacture, trade or business, or from the development of any natural resource;

“Other wastes” means sawdust, bark or other wood debris, garbage, refuse, ashes, offal, tar, oil, chemicals, acid drainage and all other foreign substances not included within the above definitions of industrial wastes and sewage which may cause or contribute to the pollution of any waters of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 261, § 1; 1978, ch. 263, § 18, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 83, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 446, § 10, effective April 12, 1982; 1994, ch. 118, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 71, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 263, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Despite transfer of the Division of Water Patrol from the Natural Resources and Environmental Protection Cabinet to the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Natural Resources and Environmental Protection Cabinet retains jurisdiction for enforcement of statutes relating to marine toilets found in KRS Chapter 235.

OAG 95-19

.

235.420.
Discharge of sewage from vessels to water prohibited — Exception.

No person shall discharge or permit from any vessel the discharge of sewage, industrial wastes or other wastes to the waters of the Commonwealth except for state waters into which discharges are allowed under federal law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 261, § 2; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 52; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2); 1978, ch. 263, § 19, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 71, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 71, sec. 13, provides that this statute “shall be enforced until July 15, 2000, only by the issuance of a warning and the distribution of information about Sections 1 to 8 of [that] Act.”

235.430.
Allowing sewage from houseboat to reach water prohibited — Exception.

No person shall dispose of sewage accumulated in a holding tank, a marine sanitation device, or other similar container on a houseboat in a manner that the sewage reaches or may reach the waters of the Commonwealth except for state waters into which discharges are allowed under federal law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 261, § 3; 1972, (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 53; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2); 1978, ch. 263, § 20, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 71, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 263, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

235.440.
Houseboat with marine toilet to have marine sanitation device.

No houseboat equipped with marine toilet facilities shall be on the waters of the Commonwealth unless the houseboat is equipped with a marine sanitation device.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 261, § 4; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 54; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2); 1978, ch. 263, § 21, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 71, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 263, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

235.450.
Motorboat not deemed equipped with marine toilet if toilet made inoperable in approved manner. [Repealed.]

235.460.
Cabinet to furnish list of approved water pollution control devices upon request. [Repealed.]

235.470.
Cabinet to issue regulations and standards — Approval of equipment. [Repealed.]